Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3213
Violations; penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of sections 71-3201 to 71-3213 or fails to perform any duty imposed upon such person by the provisions of sections 71-3201 to 71-3213 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1959, c. 329, § 13, p. 1200;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 171.